Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 28. CITIES, TOWNS AND VILLAGES

CHAPTER 21. HOUSING

Art. 1269k-1. BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS OF HOUSING AUTHORITIES AS LEGAL INVESTMENTS AND SECURITY.

Section 1. AUTHORIZATION; PURPOSE. Notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any laws of this State, the State and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law (Chapter 462, Regular Session of the 45th Legislature, as amended by House Bill No. 102, 2nd Called Session of the 45th Legislature, and amendments thereto) or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when such bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States Government or any agency thereof, or secured or guaranteed by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the United States Government or any agency thereof, and such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits; it being the purpose of this Act to authorize all persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including, but not limited to, sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Act shall be construed as relieving any person, firm, or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Sec. 2. [Repeals art. 1269k, Sec. 14-A].

Sec. 3. SEVERABILITY. Notwithstanding any other evidence of legislative intent, it is hereby declared to be the controlling legislative intent that if any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, are held invalid the remainder of the Act and the application of such provisions to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

Sec. 4. ACT CONTROLLING. In so far as the provisions of this Act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this Act shall be controlling.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., p. 427.

Sec. 1 amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 2367, ch. 729, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1971.